Illinois, session 104th, HB4091.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 5-715 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-715)7    Sec. 5-715. Probation. 8    (1) The period of probation or conditional discharge shall 9not exceed 5 years or until the minor has attained the age of 1021 years, whichever is less, except as provided in this 11Section for a minor who is found to be guilty for an offense 12which is first degree murder. The juvenile court may terminate 13probation or conditional discharge and discharge the minor at 14any time if warranted by the conduct of the minor and the ends 15of justice; provided, however, that the period of probation 16for a minor who is found to be guilty for an offense which is 17first degree murder shall be at least 5 years. 18    (1.5) The period of probation for a minor who is found 19guilty of aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 20assault, or aggravated battery with a firearm shall be at 21least 36 months. The period of probation for a minor who is 22found to be guilty of any other Class X felony shall be at 23least 24 months. The period of probation for a Class 1 or Class   HB4091 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b12 forcible felony shall be at least 18 months. Regardless of 2the length of probation ordered by the court, for all offenses 3under this subsection (1.5), the court shall schedule hearings 4to determine whether it is in the best interest of the minor 5and public safety to terminate probation after the minimum 6period of probation has been served. In such a hearing, there 7shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is in the best 8interest of the minor and public safety to terminate 9probation.10    (2) The court may as a condition of probation or of 11conditional discharge require that the minor: 12        (a) not violate any criminal statute of any 13    jurisdiction; 14        (b) make a report to and appear in person before any 15    person or agency as directed by the court; 16        (c) work or pursue a course of study or vocational 17    training; 18        (d) undergo medical or psychiatric treatment, rendered 19    by a psychiatrist or psychological treatment rendered by a 20    clinical psychologist or social work services rendered by 21    a clinical social worker, or treatment for drug addiction 22    or alcoholism; 23        (e) attend or reside in a facility established for the 24    instruction or residence of persons on probation; 25        (f) support the minor's dependents, if any; 26        (g) refrain from possessing a firearm or other   HB4091 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1    dangerous weapon, or an automobile; 2        (h) permit the probation officer to visit the minor at 3    the minor's home or elsewhere; 4        (i) reside with the minor's parents or in a foster 5    home; 6        (j) attend school; 7        (j-5) with the consent of the superintendent of the 8    facility, attend an educational program at a facility 9    other than the school in which the offense was committed 10    if the minor committed a crime of violence as defined in 11    Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act in a 12    school, on the real property comprising a school, or 13    within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising a 14    school; 15        (k) attend a non-residential program for youth; 16        (l) make restitution under the terms of subsection (4) 17    of Section 5-710; 18        (m) provide nonfinancial contributions to the minor's 19    own support at home or in a foster home; 20        (n) perform some reasonable public or community 21    service that does not interfere with school hours, 22    school-related activities, or work commitments of the 23    minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; 24        (o) participate with community corrections programs 25    including unified delinquency intervention services 26    administered by the Department of Human Services subject   HB4091 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1    to Section 5 of the Children and Family Services Act; 2        (p) (blank); 3        (q) serve a term of home confinement. In addition to 4    any other applicable condition of probation or conditional 5    discharge, the conditions of home confinement shall be 6    that the minor: 7            (i) remain within the interior premises of the 8        place designated for the minor's confinement during 9        the hours designated by the court; 10            (ii) admit any person or agent designated by the 11        court into the minor's place of confinement at any 12        time for purposes of verifying the minor's compliance 13        with the conditions of the minor's confinement; and 14            (iii) use an approved electronic monitoring device 15        if ordered by the court subject to Article 8A of 16        Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections; 17        (r) refrain from entering into a designated geographic 18    area except upon terms as the court finds appropriate. The 19    terms may include consideration of the purpose of the 20    entry, the time of day, other persons accompanying the 21    minor, and advance approval by a probation officer, if the 22    minor has been placed on probation, or advance approval by 23    the court, if the minor has been placed on conditional 24    discharge; 25        (s) refrain from having any contact, directly or 26    indirectly, with certain specified persons or particular   HB4091 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1    types of persons, including, but not limited to, members 2    of street gangs and drug users or dealers; 3        (s-5) undergo a medical or other procedure to have a 4    tattoo symbolizing allegiance to a street gang removed 5    from the minor's body; 6        (t) refrain from having in the minor's body the 7    presence of any illicit drug prohibited by the Cannabis 8    Control Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 9    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 10    unless prescribed by a physician, and shall submit samples 11    of the minor's blood or urine or both for tests to 12    determine the presence of any illicit drug; or 13        (u) comply with other conditions as may be ordered by 14    the court. 15    (3) The court may as a condition of probation or of 16conditional discharge require that a minor found guilty on any 17alcohol, cannabis, methamphetamine, or controlled substance 18violation, refrain from acquiring a driver's license during 19the period of probation or conditional discharge. If the minor 20is in possession of a permit or license, the court may require 21that the minor refrain from driving or operating any motor 22vehicle during the period of probation or conditional 23discharge, except as may be necessary in the course of the 24minor's lawful employment. 25    (3.5) The court shall, as a condition of probation or of 26conditional discharge, require that a minor found to be guilty   HB4091 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1and placed on probation for reasons that include a violation 2of Section 3.02 or Section 3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals 3Act or paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 21-1 of the 4Criminal Code of 2012 undergo medical or psychiatric treatment 5rendered by a psychiatrist or psychological treatment rendered 6by a clinical psychologist. The condition may be in addition 7to any other condition. 8    (3.10) The court shall order that a minor placed on 9probation or conditional discharge for a sex offense as 10defined in the Sex Offender Management Board Act undergo and 11successfully complete sex offender treatment. The treatment 12shall be in conformance with the standards developed under the 13Sex Offender Management Board Act and conducted by a treatment 14provider approved by the Board.15    (4) A minor on probation or conditional discharge shall be 16given a certificate setting forth the conditions upon which 17the minor is being released. 18    (5) (Blank). 19    (5.5) Jurisdiction over an offender may be transferred 20from the sentencing court to the court of another circuit with 21the concurrence of both courts. Further transfers or 22retransfers of jurisdiction are also authorized in the same 23manner. The court to which jurisdiction has been transferred 24shall have the same powers as the sentencing court.25    If the transfer case originated in another state and has 26been transferred under the Interstate Compact for Juveniles to   HB4091 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1the jurisdiction of an Illinois circuit court for supervision 2by an Illinois probation department, probation fees may be 3imposed only if permitted by the Interstate Commission for 4Juveniles. 5    (6) The General Assembly finds that in order to protect 6the public, the juvenile justice system must compel compliance 7with the conditions of probation by responding to violations 8with swift, certain, and fair punishments and intermediate 9sanctions. The Chief Judge of each circuit shall adopt a 10system of structured, intermediate sanctions for violations of 11the terms and conditions of a sentence of supervision, 12probation, or conditional discharge, under this Act. 13    The court shall provide as a condition of a disposition of 14probation, conditional discharge, or supervision, that the 15probation agency may invoke any sanction from the list of 16intermediate sanctions adopted by the chief judge of the 17circuit court for violations of the terms and conditions of 18the sentence of probation, conditional discharge, or 19supervision, subject to the provisions of Section 5-720 of 20this Act. 21    (6.5)(a) When the court places a minor on probation for an 22offense that involves the possession or discharge of a firearm 23not causing any injury, and the minor has previously been 24placed on probation for an offense that involves the 25possession or discharge of a firearm not causing any injury, 26the probation agency shall:  HB4091 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1        (i) conduct an individualized assessment of the 2    minor's needs;3        (ii) identify the array of services available in the 4    community where the minor resides that may be appropriate 5    to address the minor's needs, which may include, but are 6    not limited to, restorative justice programs, social 7    service programs for high-risk youth, cognitive behavioral 8    therapy, family engagement, and mentoring; and9        (iii) share with the minor and the minor's parent, 10    guardian, or legal custodian information about their 11    options to access services identified under this paragraph 12    (a).13    (b) The probation agency may recommend to the court that 14it require the minor to access the services identified under 15paragraph (a) as a condition of probation. 16    (7) Fines and assessments, including any fee or 17administrative cost authorized under Section 5-4.5-105, 185-5-10, 5-6-3, 5-6-3.1, 5-7-6, 5-9-1.4, or 5-9-1.9 of the 19Unified Code of Corrections, shall not be ordered or imposed 20on a minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian 21as a condition of probation, conditional discharge, or 22supervision. If the minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or 23legal custodian is unable to cover the cost of a condition 24under this subsection, the court shall not preclude the minor 25from receiving probation, conditional discharge, or 26supervision based on the inability to pay. Inability to pay   HB4091 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 14520 RLC 27660 b1shall not be grounds to object to the minor's placement on 2probation, conditional discharge, or supervision. 3(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 4103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)